Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-522
State assistance funds; how expended; medical care.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall expend state assistance funds allocated for medically handicapped children to supplement other state, county, and municipal, benevolent, fraternal, and charitable expenditures, to extend and improve, especially in rural areas and in areas suffering from severe economic distress, services for locating physically and medically handicapped children and for providing medical, surgical, correction, and other services and care, and facilities for diagnosis, hospitalization, and aftercare, for children who are physically or medically handicapped or who are suffering from conditions which lead to medical handicaps. Expenditures and services shall be uniformly distributed so far as possible or practicable under conditions and circumstances which may be found to exist.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 22, p. 188;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-522;

R.S.1943, § 43-522;

Laws 1988, LB 790, § 28;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 169;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 54;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 118.